Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.090

Funding of plan—Contributions.

The plan shall be funded as provided in this section.

(1) Two and one-half percent shall be deducted from each member's salary.

(2) The state, as employer, shall contribute an equal amount on a monthly basis.

(3) The contributions shall be collected by the administrator for the courts and deposited in the member's account within the principal account.

[ 1988 c 109 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.